Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-252
Commission; adopt rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices Act. The rules and regulations shall include limitations on the length of calls and messages and the days of the week, holidays, and time of day when calls can be made.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1216;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 114.